Utah statutes.
63A-12-104.   Rulemaking authority.

(1)  The executive director of the Department of Administrative Services, with the recommendation of the state archivist, may make rules as provided by Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement provisions of this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, dealing with procedures for the collection, storage, designation, classification, access, and management of records.

(2)  A governmental entity that includes divisions, boards, departments, committees, commissions, or other subparts that fall within the definition of a governmental entity under this chapter, may, by rule, specify at which level the requirements specified in this chapter shall be undertaken.

